Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20133-303
Airport hazard;
zoning regulations; modifications
and exceptions.

In order to prevent
the creation or establishment of airport hazards, every political subdivision
that has an airport hazard area within
the area of its zoning jurisdiction shall
adopt, administer, and enforce, under the police power and in the manner and
upon the conditions prescribed in the Airport Zoning Act,
airport zoning regulations for such airport hazard area. The regulations shall meet the minimum regulations as prescribed
by the Department of Aeronautics and may divide such
area into zones and, within such zones, specify the land uses permitted and
regulate and restrict the height to which structures may be erected and trees allowed to grow, except that a political subdivision or a joint airport
zoning board provided for in section 3-304 may include modifications or exceptions
to the airport zoning regulations adopted under the Airport Zoning Act that
the political subdivision or joint airport zoning board deems appropriate.
Such modifications and exceptions shall not be considered a conflict for the
purposes of section 3-306. The authority of a political subdivision to adopt
airport zoning regulations shall not be conditional upon prior adoption of
a comprehensive development plan or a comprehensive zoning ordinance.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 3(1), p. 683;

Laws 1961, c. 9, § 1, p. 96;

Laws 2010, LB512, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 3.